Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1181.01
Violations; penalty.

Any person engaging in livestock commerce at a licensed livestock auction market who violates any provision of sections 54-1180 and 54-1181, or any rules or regulations duly promulgated thereunder, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 454, § 3, p. 1545;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 36.